ja: 互換性のあるブレーキサービスシステム: ディスク; ディスクおよびドラム (汎用); ドラム; その他
pt-BR: Sistema de serviço de freio compatível: Disco; Disco e tambor (universal); Tambor; Outro
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav servisiranja kočnica: Disk; Disk i bubanj (univerzalno); Bubanj; Ostalo
nl: Compatibel remservicesysteem: Schijf; Schijf en trommel (universeel); Trommel; Overige
bg-BG: Съвместима сервизна спирачна система: Дискова; Дискова и барабанна (универсална); Барабанна; Друго
zh-CN: 适配的制动维护系统: 盘式; 盘式和鼓式（通用）; 鼓式; 其他
th: ชุดระบบเบรกหลักที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ดิสก์; ดิสก์และดรัม (ทั่วไป); ดรัม; อื่นๆ
pl: Kompatybilny system serwisowania hamulców: Tarczowe; Tarczowe i bębnowe (uniwersalne); Bębnowe; Inny
lt-LT: Suderinama stabdžių aptarnavimo sistema: Diskinė; Diskinė ir būgninė (universali); Būgninė; Kita
es: Sistema de servicio de frenos compatible: Disco; Disco y tambor (universal); Tambor; Otro
zh-TW: 相容煞車系統: 碟煞; 碟煞和鼓煞 (通用); 鼓煞; 其他
pt-PT: Sistema de serviço de travagem compatível: Disco; Disco e tambor (universal); Tambor; Outro
vi: Hệ thống dịch vụ phanh tương thích: Phanh đĩa; Đĩa và tang trống (phổ quát); Phanh tang trống; Khác
tr: Uyumlu fren servis sistemi: Disk; Disk ve kampana (evrensel); Kampana; Diğer
en: Compatible brake service system: Disc; Disc and drum (universal); Drum; Other
ko: 호환 브레이크 정비 시스템: 디스크; 디스크 및 드럼(범용); 드럼; 기타
ru: Совместимая тормозная система: Дисковая; Дисковые и барабанные (универсальные); Барабанные; Другое
hu: Kompatibilis fékszervizrendszer: Tárcsafék; Tárcsa és dob (univerzális); Dob; Egyéb
fr: Système de service de frein compatible: À disque; À disque et à tambour (universel); À tambour; Autre
fi: Yhteensopiva jarrunhuoltojärjestelmä: Levy; Levy ja rumpu (yleinen); Rumpu; Muu
cs: Kompatibilní systém údržby brzd: Kotoučové; Kotoučové a bubnové (univerzální); Bubnové; Ostatní
sv: Kompatibelt bromsservicesystem: Skivbroms; Skiv- och trumbroms (universell); Trumbroms; Övrigt
it: Sistema di manutenzione freni compatibile: A disco; A disco e a tamburo (universale); A tamburo; Altro
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém údržby bŕzd: Kotúčové; Kotúčové a bubnové (univerzálne); Bubnové; Iné
ro-RO: Sistem de service pentru frâne compatibil: Disc; Disc și tambur (universal); Tambur; Altele
de: Kompatibles Bremssystem: Scheibenbremse; Scheiben- und Trommelbremse (universell); Trommelbremse; Sonstige
nb: Kompatibelt bremsesystem: Skive; Skive og trommel (universal); Trommel; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem za servisiranje zavor: Kolutna zavora; Kolutna in bobnasta zavora (univerzalno); Bobnasta zavora; Drugo
el: Συμβατό σύστημα συντήρησης φρένων: Δισκόφρενο; Δισκόφρενο και ταμπούρο (γενικής χρήσης); Ταμπούρο; Άλλο
da: Kompatibelt bremseservicesystem: Skive; Skive og tromle (universel); Tromle; Andet